Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.8023

Exemption—Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account.

This chapter does not prohibit the secretary of the senate, the chief clerk of the house of representatives, or their designee from soliciting and accepting contributions to the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account created in RCW 44.04.380. Furthermore, this chapter does not prohibit any legislative member or legislative employee from soliciting gifts for the Gina Grant Bull memorial legislative page scholarship account.

[ 2017 c 322 s 4.]